Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-108
Board, defined; no board established by statute; effect.

Board means one of the boards appointed by the State Board of Health pursuant to section 38-158 or appointed by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act. For professions for which there is no board established by statute, the duties normally carried out by a board are the responsibility of the department.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 42.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.